District of Columbia statutes.
8-101.06

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor may issue or amend any rule needed to comply with the requirements of federal laws and regulations in implementing the District’s comprehensive air pollution control program.

(b)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved. Nothing in this section shall affect any requirement imposed upon the Mayor by subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

(c)

The Mayor may also issue or amend any rule needed to implement the provisions of this part pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2. Rules issued pursuant to this subsection are not subject to the 45-day Council review period prescribed in subsection (b) of this section.

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-165, § 6, 32 DCR 562
Apr. 26, 1994, D.C. Law 10-106, § 5, 41 DCR 1014
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 11-15, § 2, 42 DCR 1392
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 58, 44 DCR 1271
1981 Ed., § 6-906.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Air Pollution Control Act of 1984 National Ambient Air Quality Standards Attainment Temporary Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-262, March 27, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 2332).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3 of the Air Pollution Control Act of 1984 National Ambient Air Quality Standards Attainment Emergency Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-390, January 6, 1993, 40 DCR 683).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 5-165, District of Columbia Air Pollution Control Act of 1984, see Mayor’s Order 88-62, March 15, 1988.
Resolution 14-106, the “Air Quality Regulations Amendment Emergency Approval Resolution of 2001”, was approved effective May 1,

Application of 10-106: Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 10-106 provided that § 5 of the act shall apply as of September 30, 1993.

District of Columbia Air Pollution Control Act of 1984 Proposed Rulemaking Approval Resolution of 1998: Pursuant to Resolution 12-(PR12-693), effective June 19, 1998, the Council approved the proposed rulemaking to amend Chapters 1 through 5 and Chapters 7 and 8 of Title 20 (Environment) DCMR, issued pursuant to the “District of Columbia Air Pollution Control Act of 1984”.